Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2531YH (4) 91 jm/md H.F. 730 Section 1. SPECIAL EDUCATION WEIGHTING WORK GROUP. 1 1. School funding in Iowa has not evolved as the 2 demographics of Iowa students have changed significantly, with 3 little attention paid to supporting the special education needs 4 of students. In order to meet the needs of such students and to 5 ensure access to special education across school districts, the 6 special education weighting work group shall review the special 7 education weighting plan under section 256B.9, which has not 8 been altered since 2004, and shall consider ways to increase 9 special education weightings. 10 2. The school finance review committee met on December 11 16, 2024, and received a memo from the school budget review 12 committee that discussed how a review of special education 13 funding should be conducted. 14 3. The director of the department of education shall 15 establish and appoint members to a work group to make 16 recommendations to modify the special education weighting plan. 17 The department of education shall work cooperatively to provide 18 staffing assistance for the work group. The work group shall 19 be composed of at least all of the following: 20 a. One member representing the Iowa association of school 21 boards. 22 b. One member representing the area education agencies. 23 c. One member representing the Iowa state education 24 association. 25 d. One member representing the school administrators of 26 Iowa. 27 e. One member representing the urban education network of 28 Iowa. 29 f. One member representing the rural school advocates of 30 Iowa. 31 g. One member representing the professional educators of 32 Iowa. 33 h. One representative of the school district with the 34 highest basic enrollment under section 257.6 for the school 35 -1- LSB 2531YH (4) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 H.F. 730 budget year beginning July 1, 2024. 1 i. One representative of a school district with a basic 2 enrollment under section 257.6 for the school budget year 3 beginning July 1, 2024, that is ranked in the highest one-third 4 among all school districts in the state. 5 j. One representative of a school district with a basic 6 enrollment under section 257.6 for the school budget year 7 beginning July 1, 2024, that is ranked in the middle one-third 8 among all school districts in the state. 9 k. One representative of a school district with a basic 10 enrollment under section 257.6 for the school budget year 11 beginning July 1, 2024, that is ranked in the lowest one-third 12 among all school districts in the state. 13 l. One representative of a school district located in whole 14 or in part less than one hundred miles from the eastern border 15 of this state. 16 m. One representative of a school district located in whole 17 or in part more than one hundred miles from both the eastern 18 border of this state and the western border of this state. 19 n. One representative of a school district located in whole 20 or in part less than one hundred miles from the western border 21 of this state. 22 o. Four ex officio, nonvoting legislative members 23 consisting of the following: 24 (1) Two state senators, one appointed by the majority leader 25 of the senate and one appointed by the minority leader of the 26 senate. 27 (2) Two state representatives, one appointed by the speaker 28 and one appointed by the minority leader of the house of 29 representatives. 30 4. By January 2, 2026, the work group shall submit 31 recommendations to the general assembly and the governor for 32 adjustments to the special education weightings. 33